Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,244.01
Food Code, defined.

Food Code shall mean the 2022 Recommendations of the United States Public Health Service, Food and Drug Administration, except the definitions of adulterated food and food establishment, person in charge, regulatory authority, and sections 4-301.12(C)(5), (D), and (E), 4-603.16(C), 8-101, 8-102, 8-201.11, 8-201.12, 8-202.10 through 8-304.20, 8-401.10(B)(2), 8-402.20 through 8-403.20, 8-403.50 through 8-404.12, and 8-405.20(B). The term Food Code does not include the annexes of such federal recommendations.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 250, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB74, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB771, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB798, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB835, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 30;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 2.